Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-304 Price payable in money, goods,
realty or otherwise. (1) The price can be made payable in money or
otherwise. If it is payable in whole or in part in goods each party is a
seller of the goods which he is to transfer.

(2) Even though all or part of the price is
payable in an interest in realty the transfer of the goods and the seller's
obligations with reference to them are subject to this article, but not the
transfer of the interest in realty or the transferor's obligations in
connection therewith. [L 1965, c 208, §2-304; HRS §490:2-304]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next